Illinois, session 104th, HB1750.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 203 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/203)  (from Ch. 120, par. 2-203)7    Sec. 203. Base income defined. 8    (a) Individuals.9        (1) In general. In the case of an individual, base 10    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's adjusted 11    gross income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph 12    (2).13        (2) Modifications. The adjusted gross income referred 14    to in paragraph (1) shall be modified by adding thereto 15    the sum of the following amounts:16            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 17        to the taxpayer as interest or dividends during the 18        taxable year to the extent excluded from gross income 19        in the computation of adjusted gross income, except 20        stock dividends of qualified public utilities 21        described in Section 305(e) of the Internal Revenue 22        Code;23            (B) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by   HB1750- 2 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income in 2        the computation of adjusted gross income for the 3        taxable year;4            (C) An amount equal to the amount received during 5        the taxable year as a recovery or refund of real 6        property taxes paid with respect to the taxpayer's 7        principal residence under the Revenue Act of 1939 and 8        for which a deduction was previously taken under 9        subparagraph (L) of this paragraph (2) prior to July 10        1, 1991, the retrospective application date of Article 11        4 of Public Act 87-17. In the case of multi-unit or 12        multi-use structures and farm dwellings, the taxes on 13        the taxpayer's principal residence shall be that 14        portion of the total taxes for the entire property 15        which is attributable to such principal residence;16            (D) An amount equal to the amount of the capital 17        gain deduction allowable under the Internal Revenue 18        Code, to the extent deducted from gross income in the 19        computation of adjusted gross income;20            (D-5) An amount, to the extent not included in 21        adjusted gross income, equal to the amount of money 22        withdrawn by the taxpayer in the taxable year from a 23        medical care savings account and the interest earned 24        on the account in the taxable year of a withdrawal 25        pursuant to subsection (b) of Section 20 of the 26        Medical Care Savings Account Act or subsection (b) of   HB1750- 3 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        Section 20 of the Medical Care Savings Account Act of 2        2000;3            (D-10) For taxable years ending after December 31, 4        1997, an amount equal to any eligible remediation 5        costs that the individual deducted in computing 6        adjusted gross income and for which the individual 7        claims a credit under subsection (l) of Section 201;8            (D-15) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 9        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 10        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 11        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 12        the Internal Revenue Code;13            (D-16) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 14        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 15        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 16        addition modification under subparagraph (D-15), then 17        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 18        deductions taken in all taxable years under 19        subparagraph (Z) with respect to that property.20            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 21        the last day of the last tax year for which a 22        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 23        under subparagraph (Z) and for which the taxpayer was 24        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 25        modification under subparagraph (Z), then an amount 26        equal to that subtraction modification.   HB1750- 4 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 2        modification under this subparagraph only once with 3        respect to any one piece of property;4            (D-17) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 5        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 6        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 7        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 9        member of the same unitary business group but for the 10        fact that foreign person's business activity outside 11        the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 12        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 13        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 14        who would be a member of the same unitary business 15        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 16        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 17        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 18        required to apportion business income under different 19        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 20        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 21        extent that dividends were included in base income of 22        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 23        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 24        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 25        included in gross income under Sections 951 through 26        964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts included   HB1750- 5 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        in gross income under Section 78 of the Internal 2        Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of the same 3        person to whom the interest was paid, accrued, or 4        incurred.5            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 6                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 7            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 8            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 9            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 10            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 11            with respect to such interest; or12                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 13            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 14            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 15            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 16            following:17                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 18                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 19                to a person that is not a related member, and20                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 21                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 22                person did not have as a principal purpose the 23                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 24                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 25                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 26                terms; or   HB1750- 6 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 2            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 3            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 4            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 5            and terms and the principal purpose for the 6            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 7            or 8                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 9            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 10            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 11            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 12            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 13            to the application or use of an alternative method 14            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 15                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 16            Director from making any other adjustment 17            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 18            for any tax year beginning after the effective 19            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 20            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 21            Department and such regulations provide methods 22            and standards by which the Department will utilize 23            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 24            (D-18) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 25        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 26        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or   HB1750- 7 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 2        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 3        foreign person who would be a member of the same 4        unitary business group but for the fact that the 5        foreign person's business activity outside the United 6        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 7        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 9        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 10        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 11        from being included in the unitary business group 12        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 13        business income under different subsections of Section 14        304. The addition modification required by this 15        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 16        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 17        group for the same taxable year and received by the 18        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 19        business group (including amounts included in gross 20        income under Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal 21        Revenue Code and amounts included in gross income 22        under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) with 23        respect to the stock of the same person to whom the 24        intangible expenses and costs were directly or 25        indirectly paid, incurred, or accrued. The preceding 26        sentence does not apply to the extent that the same   HB1750- 8 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 2        modification required under Section 203(a)(2)(D-17) of 3        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 4        "intangible expenses and costs" includes (1) expenses, 5        losses, and costs for, or related to, the direct or 6        indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, 7        ownership, sale, exchange, or any other disposition of 8        intangible property; (2) losses incurred, directly or 9        indirectly, from factoring transactions or discounting 10        transactions; (3) royalty, patent, technical, and 11        copyright fees; (4) licensing fees; and (5) other 12        similar expenses and costs. For purposes of this 13        subparagraph, "intangible property" includes patents, 14        patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service 15        marks, copyrights, mask works, trade secrets, and 16        similar types of intangible assets.17            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:18                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 19            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 20            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 21            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 22            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 23            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 24            with respect to such item; or25                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 26            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or   HB1750- 9 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 2            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 3            following:4                    (a) the person during the same taxable 5                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 6                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 7                not a related member, and8                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 9                intangible expense or cost between the 10                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 11                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 12                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 13                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 14                or15                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 16            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 17            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 18            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 19            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 20            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 21            writing to the application or use of an 22            alternative method of apportionment under Section 23            304(f); 24                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 25            Director from making any other adjustment 26            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act   HB1750- 10 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1            for any tax year beginning after the effective 2            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 3            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 4            Department and such regulations provide methods 5            and standards by which the Department will utilize 6            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 7            (D-19) For taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 9        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 10        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 11        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 12        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 13        business group but for the fact that the person is 14        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 15        included in the unitary business group because he or 16        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 17        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 18        addition modification required by this subparagraph 19        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 20        included in base income of the unitary group for the 21        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 22        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 23        (including amounts included in gross income under 24        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 25        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 26        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the   HB1750- 11 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 2        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 3        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 4        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 5        the addition modification required under Section 6        203(a)(2)(D-17) or Section 203(a)(2)(D-18) of this 7        Act; 8            (D-20) For taxable years beginning on or after 9        January 1, 2002 and ending on or before December 31, 10        2006, in the case of a distribution from a qualified 11        tuition program under Section 529 of the Internal 12        Revenue Code, other than (i) a distribution from a 13        College Savings Pool created under Section 16.5 of the 14        State Treasurer Act or (ii) a distribution from the 15        Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund, an amount equal 16        to the amount excluded from gross income under Section 17        529(c)(3)(B). For taxable years beginning on or after 18        January 1, 2007, in the case of a distribution from a 19        qualified tuition program under Section 529 of the 20        Internal Revenue Code, other than (i) a distribution 21        from a College Savings Pool created under Section 16.5 22        of the State Treasurer Act, (ii) a distribution from 23        the Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund, or (iii) a 24        distribution from a qualified tuition program under 25        Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code that (I) 26        adopts and determines that its offering materials   HB1750- 12 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        comply with the College Savings Plans Network's 2        disclosure principles and (II) has made reasonable 3        efforts to inform in-state residents of the existence 4        of in-state qualified tuition programs by informing 5        Illinois residents directly and, where applicable, to 6        inform financial intermediaries distributing the 7        program to inform in-state residents of the existence 8        of in-state qualified tuition programs at least 9        annually, an amount equal to the amount excluded from 10        gross income under Section 529(c)(3)(B).11            For the purposes of this subparagraph (D-20), a 12        qualified tuition program has made reasonable efforts 13        if it makes disclosures (which may use the term 14        "in-state program" or "in-state plan" and need not 15        specifically refer to Illinois or its qualified 16        programs by name) (i) directly to prospective 17        participants in its offering materials or makes a 18        public disclosure, such as a website posting; and (ii) 19        where applicable, to intermediaries selling the 20        out-of-state program in the same manner that the 21        out-of-state program distributes its offering 22        materials;23            (D-20.5) For taxable years beginning on or after 24        January 1, 2018, in the case of a distribution from a 25        qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of the 26        Internal Revenue Code, other than a distribution from   HB1750- 13 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        a qualified ABLE program created under Section 16.6 of 2        the State Treasurer Act, an amount equal to the amount 3        excluded from gross income under Section 529A(c)(1)(B) 4        of the Internal Revenue Code; 5            (D-21) For taxable years beginning on or after 6        January 1, 2007, in the case of transfer of moneys from 7        a qualified tuition program under Section 529 of the 8        Internal Revenue Code that is administered by the 9        State to an out-of-state program, an amount equal to 10        the amount of moneys previously deducted from base 11        income under subsection (a)(2)(Y) of this Section;12            (D-21.5) For taxable years beginning on or after 13        January 1, 2018, in the case of the transfer of moneys 14        from a qualified tuition program under Section 529 or 15        a qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of the 16        Internal Revenue Code that is administered by this 17        State to an ABLE account established under an 18        out-of-state ABLE account program, an amount equal to 19        the contribution component of the transferred amount 20        that was previously deducted from base income under 21        subsection (a)(2)(Y) or subsection (a)(2)(HH) of this 22        Section; 23            (D-22) For taxable years beginning on or after 24        January 1, 2009, and prior to January 1, 2018, in the 25        case of a nonqualified withdrawal or refund of moneys 26        from a qualified tuition program under Section 529 of   HB1750- 14 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        the Internal Revenue Code administered by the State 2        that is not used for qualified expenses at an eligible 3        education institution, an amount equal to the 4        contribution component of the nonqualified withdrawal 5        or refund that was previously deducted from base 6        income under subsection (a)(2)(y) of this Section, 7        provided that the withdrawal or refund did not result 8        from the beneficiary's death or disability. For 9        taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018: 10        (1) in the case of a nonqualified withdrawal or 11        refund, as defined under Section 16.5 of the State 12        Treasurer Act, of moneys from a qualified tuition 13        program under Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code 14        administered by the State, an amount equal to the 15        contribution component of the nonqualified withdrawal 16        or refund that was previously deducted from base 17        income under subsection (a)(2)(Y) of this Section, and 18        (2) in the case of a nonqualified withdrawal or refund 19        from a qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of 20        the Internal Revenue Code administered by the State 21        that is not used for qualified disability expenses, an 22        amount equal to the contribution component of the 23        nonqualified withdrawal or refund that was previously 24        deducted from base income under subsection (a)(2)(HH) 25        of this Section;26            (D-23) An amount equal to the credit allowable to   HB1750- 15 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 2        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 3        Act;4            (D-24) For taxable years ending on or after 5        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 6        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 7        for the taxable year; 8            (D-25) In the case of a resident, an amount equal 9        to the amount of tax for which a credit is allowed 10        pursuant to Section 201(p)(7) of this Act; 11    and by deducting from the total so obtained the sum of the 12    following amounts:13            (E) For taxable years ending before December 31, 14        2001, any amount included in such total in respect of 15        any compensation (including but not limited to any 16        compensation paid or accrued to a serviceman while a 17        prisoner of war or missing in action) paid to a 18        resident by reason of being on active duty in the Armed 19        Forces of the United States and in respect of any 20        compensation paid or accrued to a resident who as a 21        governmental employee was a prisoner of war or missing 22        in action, and in respect of any compensation paid to a 23        resident in 1971 or thereafter for annual training 24        performed pursuant to Sections 502 and 503, Title 32, 25        United States Code as a member of the Illinois 26        National Guard or, beginning with taxable years ending   HB1750- 16 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        on or after December 31, 2007, the National Guard of 2        any other state. For taxable years ending on or after 3        December 31, 2001, any amount included in such total 4        in respect of any compensation (including but not 5        limited to any compensation paid or accrued to a 6        serviceman while a prisoner of war or missing in 7        action) paid to a resident by reason of being a member 8        of any component of the Armed Forces of the United 9        States and in respect of any compensation paid or 10        accrued to a resident who as a governmental employee 11        was a prisoner of war or missing in action, and in 12        respect of any compensation paid to a resident in 2001 13        or thereafter by reason of being a member of the 14        Illinois National Guard or, beginning with taxable 15        years ending on or after December 31, 2007, the 16        National Guard of any other state. The provisions of 17        this subparagraph (E) are exempt from the provisions 18        of Section 250;19            (F) An amount equal to all amounts included in 20        such total pursuant to the provisions of Sections 21        402(a), 402(c), 403(a), 403(b), 406(a), 407(a), and 22        408 of the Internal Revenue Code, or included in such 23        total as distributions under the provisions of any 24        retirement or disability plan for employees of any 25        governmental agency or unit, or retirement payments to 26        retired partners, which payments are excluded in   HB1750- 17 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        computing net earnings from self employment by Section 2        1402 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations 3        adopted pursuant thereto;4            (G) The valuation limitation amount;5            (H) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 6        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 7        and included in such total for the taxable year;8            (I) An amount equal to all amounts included in 9        such total pursuant to the provisions of Section 111 10        of the Internal Revenue Code as a recovery of items 11        previously deducted from adjusted gross income in the 12        computation of taxable income;13            (J) An amount equal to those dividends included in 14        such total which were paid by a corporation which 15        conducts business operations in a River Edge 16        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 17        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act, and conducts 18        substantially all of its operations in a River Edge 19        Redevelopment Zone or zones. This subparagraph (J) is 20        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;21            (K) An amount equal to those dividends included in 22        such total that were paid by a corporation that 23        conducts business operations in a federally designated 24        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 25        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 26        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in   HB1750- 18 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        subparagraph (J) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 2        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 3        this subparagraph (K);4            (L) For taxable years ending after December 31, 5        1983, an amount equal to all social security benefits 6        and railroad retirement benefits included in such 7        total pursuant to Sections 72(r) and 86 of the 8        Internal Revenue Code;9            (M) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 10        under subparagraph (N), an amount equal to the sum of 11        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 12        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 13        and all amounts of expenses allocable to interest and 14        disallowed as deductions by Section 265(a)(1) of the 15        Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for taxable years 16        ending on or after August 13, 1999, Sections 17        171(a)(2), 265, 280C, and 832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the 18        Internal Revenue Code, plus, for taxable years ending 19        on or after December 31, 2011, Section 45G(e)(3) of 20        the Internal Revenue Code and, for taxable years 21        ending on or after December 31, 2008, any amount 22        included in gross income under Section 87 of the 23        Internal Revenue Code; the provisions of this 24        subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of Section 25        250;26            (N) An amount equal to all amounts included in   HB1750- 19 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        such total which are exempt from taxation by this 2        State either by reason of its statutes or Constitution 3        or by reason of the Constitution, treaties or statutes 4        of the United States; provided that, in the case of any 5        statute of this State that exempts income derived from 6        bonds or other obligations from the tax imposed under 7        this Act, the amount exempted shall be the interest 8        net of bond premium amortization;9            (O) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 10        job training project established pursuant to the Tax 11        Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;12            (P) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 13        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 14        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 15        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 16        the Internal Revenue Code or of any itemized deduction 17        taken from adjusted gross income in the computation of 18        taxable income for restoration of substantial amounts 19        held under claim of right for the taxable year;20            (Q) An amount equal to any amounts included in 21        such total, received by the taxpayer as an 22        acceleration in the payment of life, endowment or 23        annuity benefits in advance of the time they would 24        otherwise be payable as an indemnity for a terminal 25        illness;26            (R) An amount equal to the amount of any federal or   HB1750- 20 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        State bonus paid to veterans of the Persian Gulf War;2            (S) An amount, to the extent included in adjusted 3        gross income, equal to the amount of a contribution 4        made in the taxable year on behalf of the taxpayer to a 5        medical care savings account established under the 6        Medical Care Savings Account Act or the Medical Care 7        Savings Account Act of 2000 to the extent the 8        contribution is accepted by the account administrator 9        as provided in that Act;10            (T) An amount, to the extent included in adjusted 11        gross income, equal to the amount of interest earned 12        in the taxable year on a medical care savings account 13        established under the Medical Care Savings Account Act 14        or the Medical Care Savings Account Act of 2000 on 15        behalf of the taxpayer, other than interest added 16        pursuant to item (D-5) of this paragraph (2);17            (U) For one taxable year beginning on or after 18        January 1, 1994, an amount equal to the total amount of 19        tax imposed and paid under subsections (a) and (b) of 20        Section 201 of this Act on grant amounts received by 21        the taxpayer under the Nursing Home Grant Assistance 22        Act during the taxpayer's taxable years 1992 and 1993;23            (V) Beginning with tax years ending on or after 24        December 31, 1995 and ending with tax years ending on 25        or before December 31, 2004, an amount equal to the 26        amount paid by a taxpayer who is a self-employed   HB1750- 21 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        taxpayer, a partner of a partnership, or a shareholder 2        in a Subchapter S corporation for health insurance or 3        long-term care insurance for that taxpayer or that 4        taxpayer's spouse or dependents, to the extent that 5        the amount paid for that health insurance or long-term 6        care insurance may be deducted under Section 213 of 7        the Internal Revenue Code, has not been deducted on 8        the federal income tax return of the taxpayer, and 9        does not exceed the taxable income attributable to 10        that taxpayer's income, self-employment income, or 11        Subchapter S corporation income; except that no 12        deduction shall be allowed under this item (V) if the 13        taxpayer is eligible to participate in any health 14        insurance or long-term care insurance plan of an 15        employer of the taxpayer or the taxpayer's spouse. The 16        amount of the health insurance and long-term care 17        insurance subtracted under this item (V) shall be 18        determined by multiplying total health insurance and 19        long-term care insurance premiums paid by the taxpayer 20        times a number that represents the fractional 21        percentage of eligible medical expenses under Section 22        213 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 not actually 23        deducted on the taxpayer's federal income tax return;24            (W) For taxable years beginning on or after 25        January 1, 1998, all amounts included in the 26        taxpayer's federal gross income in the taxable year   HB1750- 22 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        from amounts converted from a regular IRA to a Roth 2        IRA. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 3        Section 250;4            (X) For taxable year 1999 and thereafter, an 5        amount equal to the amount of any (i) distributions, 6        to the extent includible in gross income for federal 7        income tax purposes, made to the taxpayer because of 8        his or her status as a victim of persecution for racial 9        or religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 10        regime or as an heir of the victim and (ii) items of 11        income, to the extent includible in gross income for 12        federal income tax purposes, attributable to, derived 13        from or in any way related to assets stolen from, 14        hidden from, or otherwise lost to a victim of 15        persecution for racial or religious reasons by Nazi 16        Germany or any other Axis regime immediately prior to, 17        during, and immediately after World War II, including, 18        but not limited to, interest on the proceeds 19        receivable as insurance under policies issued to a 20        victim of persecution for racial or religious reasons 21        by Nazi Germany or any other Axis regime by European 22        insurance companies immediately prior to and during 23        World War II; provided, however, this subtraction from 24        federal adjusted gross income does not apply to assets 25        acquired with such assets or with the proceeds from 26        the sale of such assets; provided, further, this   HB1750- 23 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        paragraph shall only apply to a taxpayer who was the 2        first recipient of such assets after their recovery 3        and who is a victim of persecution for racial or 4        religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 5        regime or as an heir of the victim. The amount of and 6        the eligibility for any public assistance, benefit, or 7        similar entitlement is not affected by the inclusion 8        of items (i) and (ii) of this paragraph in gross income 9        for federal income tax purposes. This paragraph is 10        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;11            (Y) For taxable years beginning on or after 12        January 1, 2002 and ending on or before December 31, 13        2004, moneys contributed in the taxable year to a 14        College Savings Pool account under Section 16.5 of the 15        State Treasurer Act, except that amounts excluded from 16        gross income under Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i) of the 17        Internal Revenue Code shall not be considered moneys 18        contributed under this subparagraph (Y). For taxable 19        years beginning on or after January 1, 2005, a maximum 20        of $10,000 contributed in the taxable year to (i) a 21        College Savings Pool account under Section 16.5 of the 22        State Treasurer Act or (ii) the Illinois Prepaid 23        Tuition Trust Fund, except that amounts excluded from 24        gross income under Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i) of the 25        Internal Revenue Code shall not be considered moneys 26        contributed under this subparagraph (Y). For purposes   HB1750- 24 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        of this subparagraph, contributions made by an 2        employer on behalf of an employee, or matching 3        contributions made by an employee, shall be treated as 4        made by the employee. This subparagraph (Y) is exempt 5        from the provisions of Section 250;6            (Z) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 7        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 8        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 9        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 10        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 11        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:12                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 13            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 14            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 15            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 16            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 17            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 18            including the bonus depreciation deduction;19                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 20            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 21            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 22            0.429); and23                (3) for taxable years ending after December 24            31, 2005:25                    (i) for property on which a bonus 26                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted   HB1750- 25 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 2                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 3                by 0.429);4                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 5                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 6                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 7                1.0;8                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 9                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 10                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 11                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 12                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 13                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 14                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 15                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 16                depreciation on that property; and17                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 18                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 19                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 20                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 21                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 22                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 23                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 24                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 25                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 26                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)).   HB1750- 26 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1            The aggregate amount deducted under this 2        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 3        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 4        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 5        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 6        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 7        subparagraph (Z) is exempt from the provisions of 8        Section 250;9            (AA) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 10        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 11        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 12        addition modification under subparagraph (D-15), then 13        an amount equal to that addition modification. 14            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 15        the last day of the last tax year for which a 16        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 17        under subparagraph (Z) and for which the taxpayer was 18        required in any taxable year to make an addition 19        modification under subparagraph (D-15), then an amount 20        equal to that addition modification. 21            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 22        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 23        one piece of property.24            This subparagraph (AA) is exempt from the 25        provisions of Section 250;26            (BB) Any amount included in adjusted gross income,   HB1750- 27 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        other than salary, received by a driver in a 2        ridesharing arrangement using a motor vehicle;3            (CC) The amount of (i) any interest income (net of 4        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 5        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 6        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 7        modification with respect to such transaction under 8        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 9        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 10        the amount of that addition modification, and (ii) any 11        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 12        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 13        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 14        that is required to make an addition modification with 15        respect to such transaction under Section 16        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 17        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of that 18        addition modification. This subparagraph (CC) is 19        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;20            (DD) An amount equal to the interest income taken 21        into account for the taxable year (net of the 22        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 23        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 24        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 25        for the fact that the foreign person's business 26        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of   HB1750- 28 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 2        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 3        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 4        business group but for the fact that the person is 5        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 6        included in the unitary business group because he or 7        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 8        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 9        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 10        made for the same taxable year under Section 11        203(a)(2)(D-17) for interest paid, accrued, or 12        incurred, directly or indirectly, to the same person. 13        This subparagraph (DD) is exempt from the provisions 14        of Section 250; 15            (EE) An amount equal to the income from intangible 16        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 17        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 18        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 19        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 20        for the fact that the foreign person's business 21        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 22        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 23        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 24        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 25        business group but for the fact that the person is 26        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being   HB1750- 29 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        included in the unitary business group because he or 2        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 3        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 4        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 5        made for the same taxable year under Section 6        203(a)(2)(D-18) for intangible expenses and costs 7        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 8        the same foreign person. This subparagraph (EE) is 9        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;10            (FF) An amount equal to any amount awarded to the 11        taxpayer during the taxable year by the Court of 12        Claims under subsection (c) of Section 8 of the Court 13        of Claims Act for time unjustly served in a State 14        prison. This subparagraph (FF) is exempt from the 15        provisions of Section 250; 16            (GG) For taxable years ending on or after December 17        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 18        add back any insurance premiums under Section 19        203(a)(2)(D-19), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 20        that part of a reimbursement received from the 21        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 22        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 23        company) that would have been taken into account as a 24        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 25        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 26        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph   HB1750- 30 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        (GG), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 2        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 3        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (GG). This 4        subparagraph (GG) is exempt from the provisions of 5        Section 250; 6            (HH) For taxable years beginning on or after 7        January 1, 2018 and prior to January 1, 2028, a maximum 8        of $10,000 contributed in the taxable year to a 9        qualified ABLE account under Section 16.6 of the State 10        Treasurer Act, except that amounts excluded from gross 11        income under Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i) or Section 12        529A(c)(1)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not 13        be considered moneys contributed under this 14        subparagraph (HH). For purposes of this subparagraph 15        (HH), contributions made by an employer on behalf of 16        an employee, or matching contributions made by an 17        employee, shall be treated as made by the employee; 18            (II) For taxable years that begin on or after 19        January 1, 2021 and begin before January 1, 2026, the 20        amount that is included in the taxpayer's federal 21        adjusted gross income pursuant to Section 61 of the 22        Internal Revenue Code as discharge of indebtedness 23        attributable to student loan forgiveness and that is 24        not excluded from the taxpayer's federal adjusted 25        gross income pursuant to paragraph (5) of subsection 26        (f) of Section 108 of the Internal Revenue Code;   HB1750- 31 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1            (JJ) For taxable years beginning on or after 2        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 3        operating in this State and licensed under the 4        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 5        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 6        organization operating in this State and licensed 7        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 8        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 9        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 10        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 11        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 12        this subparagraph (JJ) are exempt from the provisions 13        of Section 250; and 14            (KK) To the extent includible in gross income for 15        federal income tax purposes, any amount awarded or 16        paid to the taxpayer as a result of a judgment or 17        settlement for fertility fraud as provided in Section 18        15 of the Illinois Fertility Fraud Act, donor 19        fertility fraud as provided in Section 20 of the 20        Illinois Fertility Fraud Act, or similar action in 21        another state; and 22            (LL) For taxable years beginning on or after 23        January 1, 2026, if the taxpayer is a qualified 24        worker, as defined in the Workforce Development 25        through Charitable Loan Repayment Act, an amount equal 26        to the amount included in the taxpayer's federal   HB1750- 32 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        adjusted gross income that is attributable to student 2        loan repayment assistance received by the taxpayer 3        during the taxable year from a qualified community 4        foundation under the provisions of the Workforce 5        Development through Through Charitable Loan Repayment 6        Act. 7            This subparagraph (LL) is exempt from the 8        provisions of Section 250; . 9            (MM) (LL) For taxable years beginning on or after 10        January 1, 2025, if the taxpayer is an eligible 11        resident as defined in the Medical Debt Relief Act, an 12        amount equal to the amount included in the taxpayer's 13        federal adjusted gross income that is attributable to 14        medical debt relief received by the taxpayer during 15        the taxable year from a nonprofit medical debt relief 16        coordinator under the provisions of the Medical Debt 17        Relief Act. This subparagraph (MM) (LL) is exempt from 18        the provisions of Section 250; . 19            (NN) For taxable years beginning on or after 20        January 1, 2026, an amount equal to the amount of 21        gratuities included in the taxpayer's federal adjusted 22        gross income for the taxable year; as used in this 23        subparagraph (NN), "gratuities" has the meaning given 24        to that term in Section 3 of the Minimum Wage Law; this 25        subparagraph (NN) is exempt from the provisions of 26        Section 250; and   HB1750- 33 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1            (OO) For taxable years beginning on or after 2        January 1, 2026, an amount equal to the amount of 3        overtime compensation that is paid to the taxpayer 4        during the taxable year and that is included in the 5        taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income; as used in 6        this subparagraph (OO), "overtime compensation" has 7        the meaning given to that term in the federal Fair 8        Labor Standards Act; this subparagraph (OO) is exempt 9        from the provisions of Section 250.  10    (b) Corporations.11        (1) In general. In the case of a corporation, base 12    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's taxable 13    income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph (2).14        (2) Modifications. The taxable income referred to in 15    paragraph (1) shall be modified by adding thereto the sum 16    of the following amounts:17            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 18        to the taxpayer as interest and all distributions 19        received from regulated investment companies during 20        the taxable year to the extent excluded from gross 21        income in the computation of taxable income;22            (B) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by 23        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income in 24        the computation of taxable income for the taxable 25        year;  HB1750- 34 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1            (C) In the case of a regulated investment company, 2        an amount equal to the excess of (i) the net long-term 3        capital gain for the taxable year, over (ii) the 4        amount of the capital gain dividends designated as 5        such in accordance with Section 852(b)(3)(C) of the 6        Internal Revenue Code and any amount designated under 7        Section 852(b)(3)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code, 8        attributable to the taxable year (this amendatory Act 9        of 1995 (Public Act 89-89) is declarative of existing 10        law and is not a new enactment);11            (D) The amount of any net operating loss deduction 12        taken in arriving at taxable income, other than a net 13        operating loss carried forward from a taxable year 14        ending prior to December 31, 1986;15            (E) For taxable years in which a net operating 16        loss carryback or carryforward from a taxable year 17        ending prior to December 31, 1986 is an element of 18        taxable income under paragraph (1) of subsection (e) 19        or subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection 20        (e), the amount by which addition modifications other 21        than those provided by this subparagraph (E) exceeded 22        subtraction modifications in such earlier taxable 23        year, with the following limitations applied in the 24        order that they are listed:25                (i) the addition modification relating to the 26            net operating loss carried back or forward to the   HB1750- 35 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 2            December 31, 1986 shall be reduced by the amount 3            of addition modification under this subparagraph 4            (E) which related to that net operating loss and 5            which was taken into account in calculating the 6            base income of an earlier taxable year, and7                (ii) the addition modification relating to the 8            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 9            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 10            December 31, 1986 shall not exceed the amount of 11            such carryback or carryforward;12            For taxable years in which there is a net 13        operating loss carryback or carryforward from more 14        than one other taxable year ending prior to December 15        31, 1986, the addition modification provided in this 16        subparagraph (E) shall be the sum of the amounts 17        computed independently under the preceding provisions 18        of this subparagraph (E) for each such taxable year;19            (E-5) For taxable years ending after December 31, 20        1997, an amount equal to any eligible remediation 21        costs that the corporation deducted in computing 22        adjusted gross income and for which the corporation 23        claims a credit under subsection (l) of Section 201;24            (E-10) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 25        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 26        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the   HB1750- 36 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 2        the Internal Revenue Code;3            (E-11) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 4        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 5        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 6        addition modification under subparagraph (E-10), then 7        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 8        deductions taken in all taxable years under 9        subparagraph (T) with respect to that property.10            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 11        the last day of the last tax year for which a 12        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 13        under subparagraph (T) and for which the taxpayer was 14        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 15        modification under subparagraph (T), then an amount 16        equal to that subtraction modification. 17            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 18        modification under this subparagraph only once with 19        respect to any one piece of property;20            (E-12) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 21        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 22        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 23        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 24        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 25        member of the same unitary business group but for the 26        fact the foreign person's business activity outside   HB1750- 37 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 2        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 3        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 4        who would be a member of the same unitary business 5        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 6        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 7        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 8        required to apportion business income under different 9        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 10        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 11        extent that dividends were included in base income of 12        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 13        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 14        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 15        included in gross income pursuant to Sections 951 16        through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts 17        included in gross income under Section 78 of the 18        Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of 19        the same person to whom the interest was paid, 20        accrued, or incurred. 21            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 22                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 23            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 24            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 25            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 26            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income   HB1750- 38 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1            with respect to such interest; or2                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 3            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 4            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 5            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 6            following:7                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 8                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 9                to a person that is not a related member, and10                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 11                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 12                person did not have as a principal purpose the 13                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 14                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 15                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 16                terms; or 17                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 18            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 19            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 20            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 21            and terms and the principal purpose for the 22            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 23            or 24                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 25            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 26            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing   HB1750- 39 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 2            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 3            to the application or use of an alternative method 4            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 5                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 6            Director from making any other adjustment 7            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 8            for any tax year beginning after the effective 9            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 10            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 11            Department and such regulations provide methods 12            and standards by which the Department will utilize 13            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 14            (E-13) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 15        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 16        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or 17        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 18        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 19        foreign person who would be a member of the same 20        unitary business group but for the fact that the 21        foreign person's business activity outside the United 22        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 23        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 24        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 25        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 26        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27)   HB1750- 40 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        from being included in the unitary business group 2        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 3        business income under different subsections of Section 4        304. The addition modification required by this 5        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 6        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 7        group for the same taxable year and received by the 8        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 9        business group (including amounts included in gross 10        income pursuant to Sections 951 through 964 of the 11        Internal Revenue Code and amounts included in gross 12        income under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) 13        with respect to the stock of the same person to whom 14        the intangible expenses and costs were directly or 15        indirectly paid, incurred, or accrued. The preceding 16        sentence shall not apply to the extent that the same 17        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 18        modification required under Section 203(b)(2)(E-12) of 19        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 20        "intangible expenses and costs" includes (1) expenses, 21        losses, and costs for, or related to, the direct or 22        indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, 23        ownership, sale, exchange, or any other disposition of 24        intangible property; (2) losses incurred, directly or 25        indirectly, from factoring transactions or discounting 26        transactions; (3) royalty, patent, technical, and   HB1750- 41 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        copyright fees; (4) licensing fees; and (5) other 2        similar expenses and costs. For purposes of this 3        subparagraph, "intangible property" includes patents, 4        patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service 5        marks, copyrights, mask works, trade secrets, and 6        similar types of intangible assets.7            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:8                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 9            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 10            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 11            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 12            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 13            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 14            with respect to such item; or15                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 16            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 17            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 18            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 19            following:20                    (a) the person during the same taxable 21                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 22                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 23                not a related member, and24                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 25                intangible expense or cost between the 26                taxpayer and the person did not have as a   HB1750- 42 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 2                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 3                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 4                or5                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 6            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 7            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 8            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 9            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 10            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 11            writing to the application or use of an 12            alternative method of apportionment under Section 13            304(f); 14                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 15            Director from making any other adjustment 16            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 17            for any tax year beginning after the effective 18            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 19            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 20            Department and such regulations provide methods 21            and standards by which the Department will utilize 22            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 23            (E-14) For taxable years ending on or after 24        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 25        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 26        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were   HB1750- 43 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 2        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 3        business group but for the fact that the person is 4        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 5        included in the unitary business group because he or 6        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 7        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 8        addition modification required by this subparagraph 9        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 10        included in base income of the unitary group for the 11        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 12        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 13        (including amounts included in gross income under 14        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 15        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 16        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the 17        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 18        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 19        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 20        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 21        the addition modification required under Section 22        203(b)(2)(E-12) or Section 203(b)(2)(E-13) of this 23        Act; 24            (E-15) For taxable years beginning after December 25        31, 2008, any deduction for dividends paid by a 26        captive real estate investment trust that is allowed   HB1750- 44 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        to a real estate investment trust under Section 2        857(b)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code for 3        dividends paid;4            (E-16) An amount equal to the credit allowable to 5        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 6        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 7        Act;8            (E-17) For taxable years ending on or after 9        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 10        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 11        for the taxable year; 12            (E-18) for taxable years beginning after December 13        31, 2018, an amount equal to the deduction allowed 14        under Section 250(a)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue 15        Code for the taxable year; 16            (E-19) for taxable years ending on or after June 17        30, 2021, an amount equal to the deduction allowed 18        under Section 250(a)(1)(B)(i) of the Internal Revenue 19        Code for the taxable year; 20            (E-20) for taxable years ending on or after June 21        30, 2021, an amount equal to the deduction allowed 22        under Sections 243(e) and 245A(a) of the Internal 23        Revenue Code for the taxable year; 24            (E-21) the amount that is claimed as a federal 25        deduction when computing the taxpayer's federal 26        taxable income for the taxable year and that is   HB1750- 45 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        attributable to an endowment gift for which the 2        taxpayer receives a credit under the Illinois Gives 3        Tax Credit Act; 4    and by deducting from the total so obtained the sum of the 5    following amounts:6            (F) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 7        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 8        and included in such total for the taxable year;9            (G) An amount equal to any amount included in such 10        total under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code;11            (H) In the case of a regulated investment company, 12        an amount equal to the amount of exempt interest 13        dividends as defined in subsection (b)(5) of Section 14        852 of the Internal Revenue Code, paid to shareholders 15        for the taxable year;16            (I) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 17        under subparagraph (J), an amount equal to the sum of 18        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 19        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) and amounts disallowed as 20        interest expense by Section 291(a)(3) of the Internal 21        Revenue Code, and all amounts of expenses allocable to 22        interest and disallowed as deductions by Section 23        265(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for 24        taxable years ending on or after August 13, 1999, 25        Sections 171(a)(2), 265, 280C, 291(a)(3), and 26        832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, plus,   HB1750- 46 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        for tax years ending on or after December 31, 2011, 2        amounts disallowed as deductions by Section 45G(e)(3) 3        of the Internal Revenue Code and, for taxable years 4        ending on or after December 31, 2008, any amount 5        included in gross income under Section 87 of the 6        Internal Revenue Code and the policyholders' share of 7        tax-exempt interest of a life insurance company under 8        Section 807(a)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code (in 9        the case of a life insurance company with gross income 10        from a decrease in reserves for the tax year) or 11        Section 807(b)(1)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code (in 12        the case of a life insurance company allowed a 13        deduction for an increase in reserves for the tax 14        year); the provisions of this subparagraph are exempt 15        from the provisions of Section 250;16            (J) An amount equal to all amounts included in 17        such total which are exempt from taxation by this 18        State either by reason of its statutes or Constitution 19        or by reason of the Constitution, treaties or statutes 20        of the United States; provided that, in the case of any 21        statute of this State that exempts income derived from 22        bonds or other obligations from the tax imposed under 23        this Act, the amount exempted shall be the interest 24        net of bond premium amortization;25            (K) An amount equal to those dividends included in 26        such total which were paid by a corporation which   HB1750- 47 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        conducts business operations in a River Edge 2        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 3        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act and conducts substantially 4        all of its operations in a River Edge Redevelopment 5        Zone or zones. This subparagraph (K) is exempt from 6        the provisions of Section 250;7            (L) An amount equal to those dividends included in 8        such total that were paid by a corporation that 9        conducts business operations in a federally designated 10        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 11        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 12        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in 13        subparagraph (K) of paragraph 2 of this subsection 14        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 15        this subparagraph (L);16            (M) For any taxpayer that is a financial 17        organization within the meaning of Section 304(c) of 18        this Act, an amount included in such total as interest 19        income from a loan or loans made by such taxpayer to a 20        borrower, to the extent that such a loan is secured by 21        property which is eligible for the River Edge 22        Redevelopment Zone Investment Credit. To determine the 23        portion of a loan or loans that is secured by property 24        eligible for a Section 201(f) investment credit to the 25        borrower, the entire principal amount of the loan or 26        loans between the taxpayer and the borrower should be   HB1750- 48 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        divided into the basis of the Section 201(f) 2        investment credit property which secures the loan or 3        loans, using for this purpose the original basis of 4        such property on the date that it was placed in service 5        in the River Edge Redevelopment Zone. The subtraction 6        modification available to the taxpayer in any year 7        under this subsection shall be that portion of the 8        total interest paid by the borrower with respect to 9        such loan attributable to the eligible property as 10        calculated under the previous sentence. This 11        subparagraph (M) is exempt from the provisions of 12        Section 250;13            (M-1) For any taxpayer that is a financial 14        organization within the meaning of Section 304(c) of 15        this Act, an amount included in such total as interest 16        income from a loan or loans made by such taxpayer to a 17        borrower, to the extent that such a loan is secured by 18        property which is eligible for the High Impact 19        Business Investment Credit. To determine the portion 20        of a loan or loans that is secured by property eligible 21        for a Section 201(h) investment credit to the 22        borrower, the entire principal amount of the loan or 23        loans between the taxpayer and the borrower should be 24        divided into the basis of the Section 201(h) 25        investment credit property which secures the loan or 26        loans, using for this purpose the original basis of   HB1750- 49 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        such property on the date that it was placed in service 2        in a federally designated Foreign Trade Zone or 3        Sub-Zone located in Illinois. No taxpayer that is 4        eligible for the deduction provided in subparagraph 5        (M) of paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be 6        eligible for the deduction provided under this 7        subparagraph (M-1). The subtraction modification 8        available to taxpayers in any year under this 9        subsection shall be that portion of the total interest 10        paid by the borrower with respect to such loan 11        attributable to the eligible property as calculated 12        under the previous sentence;13            (N) Two times any contribution made during the 14        taxable year to a designated zone organization to the 15        extent that the contribution (i) qualifies as a 16        charitable contribution under subsection (c) of 17        Section 170 of the Internal Revenue Code and (ii) 18        must, by its terms, be used for a project approved by 19        the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 20        under Section 11 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act 21        or under Section 10-10 of the River Edge Redevelopment 22        Zone Act. This subparagraph (N) is exempt from the 23        provisions of Section 250;24            (O) An amount equal to: (i) 85% for taxable years 25        ending on or before December 31, 1992, or, a 26        percentage equal to the percentage allowable under   HB1750- 50 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        Section 243(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 2        for taxable years ending after December 31, 1992, of 3        the amount by which dividends included in taxable 4        income and received from a corporation that is not 5        created or organized under the laws of the United 6        States or any state or political subdivision thereof, 7        including, for taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 1988, dividends received or deemed 9        received or paid or deemed paid under Sections 951 10        through 965 of the Internal Revenue Code, exceed the 11        amount of the modification provided under subparagraph 12        (G) of paragraph (2) of this subsection (b) which is 13        related to such dividends, and including, for taxable 14        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, dividends 15        received from a captive real estate investment trust; 16        plus (ii) 100% of the amount by which dividends, 17        included in taxable income and received, including, 18        for taxable years ending on or after December 31, 19        1988, dividends received or deemed received or paid or 20        deemed paid under Sections 951 through 964 of the 21        Internal Revenue Code and including, for taxable years 22        ending on or after December 31, 2008, dividends 23        received from a captive real estate investment trust, 24        from any such corporation specified in clause (i) that 25        would but for the provisions of Section 1504(b)(3) of 26        the Internal Revenue Code be treated as a member of the   HB1750- 51 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        affiliated group which includes the dividend 2        recipient, exceed the amount of the modification 3        provided under subparagraph (G) of paragraph (2) of 4        this subsection (b) which is related to such 5        dividends. For taxable years ending on or after June 6        30, 2021, (i) for purposes of this subparagraph, the 7        term "dividend" does not include any amount treated as 8        a dividend under Section 1248 of the Internal Revenue 9        Code, and (ii) this subparagraph shall not apply to 10        dividends for which a deduction is allowed under 11        Section 245(a) of the Internal Revenue Code. This 12        subparagraph (O) is exempt from the provisions of 13        Section 250 of this Act;14            (P) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 15        job training project established pursuant to the Tax 16        Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;17            (Q) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 18        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 19        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 20        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 21        the Internal Revenue Code;22            (R) On and after July 20, 1999, in the case of an 23        attorney-in-fact with respect to whom an interinsurer 24        or a reciprocal insurer has made the election under 25        Section 835 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 26        835, an amount equal to the excess, if any, of the   HB1750- 52 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        amounts paid or incurred by that interinsurer or 2        reciprocal insurer in the taxable year to the 3        attorney-in-fact over the deduction allowed to that 4        interinsurer or reciprocal insurer with respect to the 5        attorney-in-fact under Section 835(b) of the Internal 6        Revenue Code for the taxable year; the provisions of 7        this subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of 8        Section 250;9            (S) For taxable years ending on or after December 10        31, 1997, in the case of a Subchapter S corporation, an 11        amount equal to all amounts of income allocable to a 12        shareholder subject to the Personal Property Tax 13        Replacement Income Tax imposed by subsections (c) and 14        (d) of Section 201 of this Act, including amounts 15        allocable to organizations exempt from federal income 16        tax by reason of Section 501(a) of the Internal 17        Revenue Code. This subparagraph (S) is exempt from the 18        provisions of Section 250;19            (T) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 20        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 21        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 22        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 23        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 24        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:25                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 26            deduction taken for the taxable year on the   HB1750- 53 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 2            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 3            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 4            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 5            including the bonus depreciation deduction;6                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 7            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 8            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 9            0.429); and10                (3) for taxable years ending after December 11            31, 2005:12                    (i) for property on which a bonus 13                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 14                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 15                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 16                by 0.429);17                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 18                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 19                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 20                1.0;21                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 22                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 23                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 24                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 25                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 26                on that property if the taxpayer had made the   HB1750- 54 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 2                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 3                depreciation on that property; and4                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 5                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 6                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 7                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 8                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 9                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 10                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 11                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 12                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 13                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 14            The aggregate amount deducted under this 15        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 16        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 17        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 18        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 19        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 20        subparagraph (T) is exempt from the provisions of 21        Section 250;22            (U) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, or 23        otherwise disposes of property for which the taxpayer 24        was required in any taxable year to make an addition 25        modification under subparagraph (E-10), then an amount 26        equal to that addition modification.  HB1750- 55 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 2        the last day of the last tax year for which a 3        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 4        under subparagraph (T) and for which the taxpayer was 5        required in any taxable year to make an addition 6        modification under subparagraph (E-10), then an amount 7        equal to that addition modification. 8            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 9        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 10        one piece of property.11            This subparagraph (U) is exempt from the 12        provisions of Section 250;13            (V) The amount of: (i) any interest income (net of 14        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 15        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 16        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 17        modification with respect to such transaction under 18        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 19        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 20        the amount of such addition modification, (ii) any 21        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 22        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 23        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 24        that is required to make an addition modification with 25        respect to such transaction under Section 26        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or   HB1750- 56 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of such 2        addition modification, and (iii) any insurance premium 3        income (net of deductions allocable thereto) taken 4        into account for the taxable year with respect to a 5        transaction with a taxpayer that is required to make 6        an addition modification with respect to such 7        transaction under Section 203(a)(2)(D-19), Section 8        203(b)(2)(E-14), Section 203(c)(2)(G-14), or Section 9        203(d)(2)(D-9), but not to exceed the amount of that 10        addition modification. This subparagraph (V) is exempt 11        from the provisions of Section 250; 12            (W) An amount equal to the interest income taken 13        into account for the taxable year (net of the 14        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 15        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 16        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 17        for the fact that the foreign person's business 18        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 19        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 20        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 21        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 22        business group but for the fact that the person is 23        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 24        included in the unitary business group because he or 25        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 26        income under different subsections of Section 304, but   HB1750- 57 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 2        made for the same taxable year under Section 3        203(b)(2)(E-12) for interest paid, accrued, or 4        incurred, directly or indirectly, to the same person. 5        This subparagraph (W) is exempt from the provisions of 6        Section 250; 7            (X) An amount equal to the income from intangible 8        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 9        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 10        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 11        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 12        for the fact that the foreign person's business 13        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 14        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 15        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 16        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 17        business group but for the fact that the person is 18        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 19        included in the unitary business group because he or 20        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 21        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 22        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 23        made for the same taxable year under Section 24        203(b)(2)(E-13) for intangible expenses and costs 25        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 26        the same foreign person. This subparagraph (X) is   HB1750- 58 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        exempt from the provisions of Section 250; 2            (Y) For taxable years ending on or after December 3        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 4        add back any insurance premiums under Section 5        203(b)(2)(E-14), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 6        that part of a reimbursement received from the 7        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 8        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 9        company) that would have been taken into account as a 10        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 11        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 12        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 13        (Y), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 14        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 15        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (Y). This 16        subparagraph (Y) is exempt from the provisions of 17        Section 250; 18            (Z) The difference between the nondeductible 19        controlled foreign corporation dividends under Section 20        965(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code over the 21        taxable income of the taxpayer, computed without 22        regard to Section 965(e)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue 23        Code, and without regard to any net operating loss 24        deduction. This subparagraph (Z) is exempt from the 25        provisions of Section 250; and 26            (AA) For taxable years beginning on or after   HB1750- 59 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 2        operating in this State and licensed under the 3        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 4        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 5        organization operating in this State and licensed 6        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 7        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 8        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 9        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 10        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 11        this subparagraph (AA) are exempt from the provisions 12        of Section 250. 13        (3) Special rule. For purposes of paragraph (2)(A), 14    "gross income" in the case of a life insurance company, 15    for tax years ending on and after December 31, 1994, and 16    prior to December 31, 2011, shall mean the gross 17    investment income for the taxable year and, for tax years 18    ending on or after December 31, 2011, shall mean all 19    amounts included in life insurance gross income under 20    Section 803(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. 21    (c) Trusts and estates.22        (1) In general. In the case of a trust or estate, base 23    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's taxable 24    income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph (2).25        (2) Modifications. Subject to the provisions of   HB1750- 60 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1    paragraph (3), the taxable income referred to in paragraph 2    (1) shall be modified by adding thereto the sum of the 3    following amounts:4            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 5        to the taxpayer as interest or dividends during the 6        taxable year to the extent excluded from gross income 7        in the computation of taxable income;8            (B) In the case of (i) an estate, $600; (ii) a 9        trust which, under its governing instrument, is 10        required to distribute all of its income currently, 11        $300; and (iii) any other trust, $100, but in each such 12        case, only to the extent such amount was deducted in 13        the computation of taxable income;14            (C) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by 15        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income in 16        the computation of taxable income for the taxable 17        year;18            (D) The amount of any net operating loss deduction 19        taken in arriving at taxable income, other than a net 20        operating loss carried forward from a taxable year 21        ending prior to December 31, 1986;22            (E) For taxable years in which a net operating 23        loss carryback or carryforward from a taxable year 24        ending prior to December 31, 1986 is an element of 25        taxable income under paragraph (1) of subsection (e) 26        or subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection   HB1750- 61 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        (e), the amount by which addition modifications other 2        than those provided by this subparagraph (E) exceeded 3        subtraction modifications in such taxable year, with 4        the following limitations applied in the order that 5        they are listed:6                (i) the addition modification relating to the 7            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 8            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 9            December 31, 1986 shall be reduced by the amount 10            of addition modification under this subparagraph 11            (E) which related to that net operating loss and 12            which was taken into account in calculating the 13            base income of an earlier taxable year, and14                (ii) the addition modification relating to the 15            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 16            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 17            December 31, 1986 shall not exceed the amount of 18            such carryback or carryforward;19            For taxable years in which there is a net 20        operating loss carryback or carryforward from more 21        than one other taxable year ending prior to December 22        31, 1986, the addition modification provided in this 23        subparagraph (E) shall be the sum of the amounts 24        computed independently under the preceding provisions 25        of this subparagraph (E) for each such taxable year;26            (F) For taxable years ending on or after January   HB1750- 62 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        1, 1989, an amount equal to the tax deducted pursuant 2        to Section 164 of the Internal Revenue Code if the 3        trust or estate is claiming the same tax for purposes 4        of the Illinois foreign tax credit under Section 601 5        of this Act;6            (G) An amount equal to the amount of the capital 7        gain deduction allowable under the Internal Revenue 8        Code, to the extent deducted from gross income in the 9        computation of taxable income;10            (G-5) For taxable years ending after December 31, 11        1997, an amount equal to any eligible remediation 12        costs that the trust or estate deducted in computing 13        adjusted gross income and for which the trust or 14        estate claims a credit under subsection (l) of Section 15        201;16            (G-10) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 17        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 18        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 19        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 20        the Internal Revenue Code; and21            (G-11) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 22        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 23        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 24        addition modification under subparagraph (G-10), then 25        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 26        deductions taken in all taxable years under   HB1750- 63 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        subparagraph (R) with respect to that property.2            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 3        the last day of the last tax year for which a 4        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 5        under subparagraph (R) and for which the taxpayer was 6        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 7        modification under subparagraph (R), then an amount 8        equal to that subtraction modification. 9            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 10        modification under this subparagraph only once with 11        respect to any one piece of property;12            (G-12) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 13        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 14        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 15        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 16        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 17        member of the same unitary business group but for the 18        fact that the foreign person's business activity 19        outside the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 20        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 21        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 22        who would be a member of the same unitary business 23        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 24        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 25        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 26        required to apportion business income under different   HB1750- 64 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 2        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 3        extent that dividends were included in base income of 4        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 5        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 6        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 7        included in gross income pursuant to Sections 951 8        through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts 9        included in gross income under Section 78 of the 10        Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of 11        the same person to whom the interest was paid, 12        accrued, or incurred. 13            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 14                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 15            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 16            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 17            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 18            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 19            with respect to such interest; or20                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 21            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 22            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 23            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 24            following:25                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 26                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest   HB1750- 65 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1                to a person that is not a related member, and2                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 3                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 4                person did not have as a principal purpose the 5                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 6                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 7                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 8                terms; or 9                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 10            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 11            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 12            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 13            and terms and the principal purpose for the 14            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 15            or 16                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 17            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 18            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 19            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 20            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 21            to the application or use of an alternative method 22            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 23                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 24            Director from making any other adjustment 25            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 26            for any tax year beginning after the effective   HB1750- 66 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 2            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 3            Department and such regulations provide methods 4            and standards by which the Department will utilize 5            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 6            (G-13) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 7        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 8        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or 9        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 10        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 11        foreign person who would be a member of the same 12        unitary business group but for the fact that the 13        foreign person's business activity outside the United 14        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 15        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 16        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 17        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 18        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 19        from being included in the unitary business group 20        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 21        business income under different subsections of Section 22        304. The addition modification required by this 23        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 24        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 25        group for the same taxable year and received by the 26        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary   HB1750- 67 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        business group (including amounts included in gross 2        income pursuant to Sections 951 through 964 of the 3        Internal Revenue Code and amounts included in gross 4        income under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) 5        with respect to the stock of the same person to whom 6        the intangible expenses and costs were directly or 7        indirectly paid, incurred, or accrued. The preceding 8        sentence shall not apply to the extent that the same 9        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 10        modification required under Section 203(c)(2)(G-12) of 11        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 12        "intangible expenses and costs" includes: (1) 13        expenses, losses, and costs for or related to the 14        direct or indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or 15        management, ownership, sale, exchange, or any other 16        disposition of intangible property; (2) losses 17        incurred, directly or indirectly, from factoring 18        transactions or discounting transactions; (3) royalty, 19        patent, technical, and copyright fees; (4) licensing 20        fees; and (5) other similar expenses and costs. For 21        purposes of this subparagraph, "intangible property" 22        includes patents, patent applications, trade names, 23        trademarks, service marks, copyrights, mask works, 24        trade secrets, and similar types of intangible assets.25            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:26                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs   HB1750- 68 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 2            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 3            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 4            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 5            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 6            with respect to such item; or7                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 8            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 9            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 10            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 11            following:12                    (a) the person during the same taxable 13                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 14                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 15                not a related member, and16                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 17                intangible expense or cost between the 18                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 19                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 20                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 21                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 22                or23                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 24            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 25            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 26            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing   HB1750- 69 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 2            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 3            writing to the application or use of an 4            alternative method of apportionment under Section 5            304(f); 6                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 7            Director from making any other adjustment 8            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 9            for any tax year beginning after the effective 10            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 11            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 12            Department and such regulations provide methods 13            and standards by which the Department will utilize 14            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 15            (G-14) For taxable years ending on or after 16        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 17        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 18        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 19        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 20        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 21        business group but for the fact that the person is 22        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 23        included in the unitary business group because he or 24        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 25        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 26        addition modification required by this subparagraph   HB1750- 70 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 2        included in base income of the unitary group for the 3        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 4        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 5        (including amounts included in gross income under 6        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 7        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 8        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the 9        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 10        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 11        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 12        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 13        the addition modification required under Section 14        203(c)(2)(G-12) or Section 203(c)(2)(G-13) of this 15        Act;16            (G-15) An amount equal to the credit allowable to 17        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 18        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 19        Act;20            (G-16) For taxable years ending on or after 21        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 22        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 23        for the taxable year; 24            (G-17) the amount that is claimed as a federal 25        deduction when computing the taxpayer's federal 26        taxable income for the taxable year and that is   HB1750- 71 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        attributable to an endowment gift for which the 2        taxpayer receives a credit under the Illinois Gives 3        Tax Credit Act; 4    and by deducting from the total so obtained the sum of the 5    following amounts:6            (H) An amount equal to all amounts included in 7        such total pursuant to the provisions of Sections 8        402(a), 402(c), 403(a), 403(b), 406(a), 407(a) and 408 9        of the Internal Revenue Code or included in such total 10        as distributions under the provisions of any 11        retirement or disability plan for employees of any 12        governmental agency or unit, or retirement payments to 13        retired partners, which payments are excluded in 14        computing net earnings from self employment by Section 15        1402 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations 16        adopted pursuant thereto;17            (I) The valuation limitation amount;18            (J) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 19        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 20        and included in such total for the taxable year;21            (K) An amount equal to all amounts included in 22        taxable income as modified by subparagraphs (A), (B), 23        (C), (D), (E), (F) and (G) which are exempt from 24        taxation by this State either by reason of its 25        statutes or Constitution or by reason of the 26        Constitution, treaties or statutes of the United   HB1750- 72 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        States; provided that, in the case of any statute of 2        this State that exempts income derived from bonds or 3        other obligations from the tax imposed under this Act, 4        the amount exempted shall be the interest net of bond 5        premium amortization;6            (L) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 7        under subparagraph (K), an amount equal to the sum of 8        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 9        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 10        and all amounts of expenses allocable to interest and 11        disallowed as deductions by Section 265(a)(1) of the 12        Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for taxable years 13        ending on or after August 13, 1999, Sections 14        171(a)(2), 265, 280C, and 832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the 15        Internal Revenue Code, plus, (iii) for taxable years 16        ending on or after December 31, 2011, Section 17        45G(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and, for 18        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, 19        any amount included in gross income under Section 87 20        of the Internal Revenue Code; the provisions of this 21        subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of Section 22        250;23            (M) An amount equal to those dividends included in 24        such total which were paid by a corporation which 25        conducts business operations in a River Edge 26        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River   HB1750- 73 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act and conducts substantially 2        all of its operations in a River Edge Redevelopment 3        Zone or zones. This subparagraph (M) is exempt from 4        the provisions of Section 250;5            (N) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 6        job training project established pursuant to the Tax 7        Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;8            (O) An amount equal to those dividends included in 9        such total that were paid by a corporation that 10        conducts business operations in a federally designated 11        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 12        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 13        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in 14        subparagraph (M) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 15        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 16        this subparagraph (O);17            (P) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 18        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 19        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 20        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 21        the Internal Revenue Code;22            (Q) For taxable year 1999 and thereafter, an 23        amount equal to the amount of any (i) distributions, 24        to the extent includible in gross income for federal 25        income tax purposes, made to the taxpayer because of 26        his or her status as a victim of persecution for racial   HB1750- 74 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        or religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 2        regime or as an heir of the victim and (ii) items of 3        income, to the extent includible in gross income for 4        federal income tax purposes, attributable to, derived 5        from or in any way related to assets stolen from, 6        hidden from, or otherwise lost to a victim of 7        persecution for racial or religious reasons by Nazi 8        Germany or any other Axis regime immediately prior to, 9        during, and immediately after World War II, including, 10        but not limited to, interest on the proceeds 11        receivable as insurance under policies issued to a 12        victim of persecution for racial or religious reasons 13        by Nazi Germany or any other Axis regime by European 14        insurance companies immediately prior to and during 15        World War II; provided, however, this subtraction from 16        federal adjusted gross income does not apply to assets 17        acquired with such assets or with the proceeds from 18        the sale of such assets; provided, further, this 19        paragraph shall only apply to a taxpayer who was the 20        first recipient of such assets after their recovery 21        and who is a victim of persecution for racial or 22        religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 23        regime or as an heir of the victim. The amount of and 24        the eligibility for any public assistance, benefit, or 25        similar entitlement is not affected by the inclusion 26        of items (i) and (ii) of this paragraph in gross income   HB1750- 75 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        for federal income tax purposes. This paragraph is 2        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;3            (R) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 4        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 5        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 6        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 7        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 8        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:9                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 10            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 11            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 12            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 13            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 14            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 15            including the bonus depreciation deduction;16                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 17            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 18            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 19            0.429); and20                (3) for taxable years ending after December 21            31, 2005:22                    (i) for property on which a bonus 23                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 24                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 25                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 26                by 0.429);  HB1750- 76 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 2                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 3                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 4                1.0;5                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 6                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 7                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 8                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 9                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 10                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 11                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 12                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 13                depreciation on that property; and14                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 15                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 16                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 17                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 18                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 19                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 20                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 21                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 22                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 23                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 24            The aggregate amount deducted under this 25        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 26        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus   HB1750- 77 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 2        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 3        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 4        subparagraph (R) is exempt from the provisions of 5        Section 250;6            (S) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, or 7        otherwise disposes of property for which the taxpayer 8        was required in any taxable year to make an addition 9        modification under subparagraph (G-10), then an amount 10        equal to that addition modification.11            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 12        the last day of the last tax year for which a 13        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 14        under subparagraph (R) and for which the taxpayer was 15        required in any taxable year to make an addition 16        modification under subparagraph (G-10), then an amount 17        equal to that addition modification. 18            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 19        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 20        one piece of property.21            This subparagraph (S) is exempt from the 22        provisions of Section 250;23            (T) The amount of (i) any interest income (net of 24        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 25        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 26        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition   HB1750- 78 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        modification with respect to such transaction under 2        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 3        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 4        the amount of such addition modification and (ii) any 5        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 6        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 7        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 8        that is required to make an addition modification with 9        respect to such transaction under Section 10        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 11        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of such 12        addition modification. This subparagraph (T) is exempt 13        from the provisions of Section 250; 14            (U) An amount equal to the interest income taken 15        into account for the taxable year (net of the 16        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 17        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 18        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 19        for the fact the foreign person's business activity 20        outside the United States is 80% or more of that 21        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 22        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 23        who would be a member of the same unitary business 24        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 25        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 26        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily   HB1750- 79 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        required to apportion business income under different 2        subsections of Section 304, but not to exceed the 3        addition modification required to be made for the same 4        taxable year under Section 203(c)(2)(G-12) for 5        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 6        indirectly, to the same person. This subparagraph (U) 7        is exempt from the provisions of Section 250; 8            (V) An amount equal to the income from intangible 9        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 10        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 11        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 12        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 13        for the fact that the foreign person's business 14        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 15        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 16        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 17        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 18        business group but for the fact that the person is 19        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 20        included in the unitary business group because he or 21        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 22        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 23        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 24        made for the same taxable year under Section 25        203(c)(2)(G-13) for intangible expenses and costs 26        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to   HB1750- 80 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        the same foreign person. This subparagraph (V) is 2        exempt from the provisions of Section 250; 3            (W) in the case of an estate, an amount equal to 4        all amounts included in such total pursuant to the 5        provisions of Section 111 of the Internal Revenue Code 6        as a recovery of items previously deducted by the 7        decedent from adjusted gross income in the computation 8        of taxable income. This subparagraph (W) is exempt 9        from Section 250; 10            (X) an amount equal to the refund included in such 11        total of any tax deducted for federal income tax 12        purposes, to the extent that deduction was added back 13        under subparagraph (F). This subparagraph (X) is 14        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;15            (Y) For taxable years ending on or after December 16        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 17        add back any insurance premiums under Section 18        203(c)(2)(G-14), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 19        that part of a reimbursement received from the 20        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 21        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 22        company) that would have been taken into account as a 23        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 24        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 25        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 26        (Y), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must   HB1750- 81 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 2        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (Y). This 3        subparagraph (Y) is exempt from the provisions of 4        Section 250;5            (Z) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 6        2018 and before January 1, 2026, the amount of excess 7        business loss of the taxpayer disallowed as a 8        deduction by Section 461(l)(1)(B) of the Internal 9        Revenue Code; and 10            (AA) For taxable years beginning on or after 11        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 12        operating in this State and licensed under the 13        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 14        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 15        organization operating in this State and licensed 16        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 17        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 18        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 19        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 20        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 21        this subparagraph (AA) are exempt from the provisions 22        of Section 250. 23        (3) Limitation. The amount of any modification 24    otherwise required under this subsection shall, under 25    regulations prescribed by the Department, be adjusted by 26    any amounts included therein which were properly paid,   HB1750- 82 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1    credited, or required to be distributed, or permanently 2    set aside for charitable purposes pursuant to Internal 3    Revenue Code Section 642(c) during the taxable year. 4    (d) Partnerships.5        (1) In general. In the case of a partnership, base 6    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's taxable 7    income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph (2).8        (2) Modifications. The taxable income referred to in 9    paragraph (1) shall be modified by adding thereto the sum 10    of the following amounts:11            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 12        to the taxpayer as interest or dividends during the 13        taxable year to the extent excluded from gross income 14        in the computation of taxable income;15            (B) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by 16        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income for 17        the taxable year;18            (C) The amount of deductions allowed to the 19        partnership pursuant to Section 707 (c) of the 20        Internal Revenue Code in calculating its taxable 21        income;22            (D) An amount equal to the amount of the capital 23        gain deduction allowable under the Internal Revenue 24        Code, to the extent deducted from gross income in the 25        computation of taxable income;  HB1750- 83 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1            (D-5) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 2        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 3        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 4        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 5        the Internal Revenue Code;6            (D-6) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 7        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 8        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 9        addition modification under subparagraph (D-5), then 10        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 11        deductions taken in all taxable years under 12        subparagraph (O) with respect to that property.13            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 14        the last day of the last tax year for which a 15        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 16        under subparagraph (O) and for which the taxpayer was 17        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 18        modification under subparagraph (O), then an amount 19        equal to that subtraction modification. 20            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 21        modification under this subparagraph only once with 22        respect to any one piece of property;23            (D-7) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 24        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 25        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 26        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after   HB1750- 84 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 2        member of the same unitary business group but for the 3        fact the foreign person's business activity outside 4        the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 5        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 6        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 7        who would be a member of the same unitary business 8        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 9        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 10        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 11        required to apportion business income under different 12        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 13        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 14        extent that dividends were included in base income of 15        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 16        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 17        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 18        included in gross income pursuant to Sections 951 19        through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts 20        included in gross income under Section 78 of the 21        Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of 22        the same person to whom the interest was paid, 23        accrued, or incurred. 24            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 25                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 26            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who   HB1750- 85 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 2            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 3            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 4            with respect to such interest; or5                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 6            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 7            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 8            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 9            following:10                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 11                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 12                to a person that is not a related member, and13                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 14                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 15                person did not have as a principal purpose the 16                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 17                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 18                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 19                terms; or 20                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 21            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 22            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 23            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 24            and terms and the principal purpose for the 25            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 26            or   HB1750- 86 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 2            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 3            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 4            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 5            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 6            to the application or use of an alternative method 7            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 8                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 9            Director from making any other adjustment 10            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 11            for any tax year beginning after the effective 12            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 13            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 14            Department and such regulations provide methods 15            and standards by which the Department will utilize 16            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; and 17            (D-8) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 18        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 19        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or 20        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 21        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 22        foreign person who would be a member of the same 23        unitary business group but for the fact that the 24        foreign person's business activity outside the United 25        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 26        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after   HB1750- 87 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 2        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 3        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 4        from being included in the unitary business group 5        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 6        business income under different subsections of Section 7        304. The addition modification required by this 8        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 9        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 10        group for the same taxable year and received by the 11        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 12        business group (including amounts included in gross 13        income pursuant to Sections 951 through 964 of the 14        Internal Revenue Code and amounts included in gross 15        income under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) 16        with respect to the stock of the same person to whom 17        the intangible expenses and costs were directly or 18        indirectly paid, incurred or accrued. The preceding 19        sentence shall not apply to the extent that the same 20        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 21        modification required under Section 203(d)(2)(D-7) of 22        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 23        "intangible expenses and costs" includes (1) expenses, 24        losses, and costs for, or related to, the direct or 25        indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, 26        ownership, sale, exchange, or any other disposition of   HB1750- 88 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        intangible property; (2) losses incurred, directly or 2        indirectly, from factoring transactions or discounting 3        transactions; (3) royalty, patent, technical, and 4        copyright fees; (4) licensing fees; and (5) other 5        similar expenses and costs. For purposes of this 6        subparagraph, "intangible property" includes patents, 7        patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service 8        marks, copyrights, mask works, trade secrets, and 9        similar types of intangible assets;10            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:11                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 12            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 13            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 14            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 15            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 16            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 17            with respect to such item; or18                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 19            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 20            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 21            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 22            following:23                    (a) the person during the same taxable 24                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 25                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 26                not a related member, and  HB1750- 89 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 2                intangible expense or cost between the 3                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 4                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 5                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 6                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 7                or8                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 9            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 10            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 11            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 12            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 13            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 14            writing to the application or use of an 15            alternative method of apportionment under Section 16            304(f); 17                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 18            Director from making any other adjustment 19            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 20            for any tax year beginning after the effective 21            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 22            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 23            Department and such regulations provide methods 24            and standards by which the Department will utilize 25            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 26            (D-9) For taxable years ending on or after   HB1750- 90 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 2        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 3        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 4        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 5        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 6        business group but for the fact that the person is 7        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 8        included in the unitary business group because he or 9        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 10        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 11        addition modification required by this subparagraph 12        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 13        included in base income of the unitary group for the 14        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 15        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 16        (including amounts included in gross income under 17        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 18        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 19        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the 20        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 21        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 22        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 23        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 24        the addition modification required under Section 25        203(d)(2)(D-7) or Section 203(d)(2)(D-8) of this Act;26            (D-10) An amount equal to the credit allowable to   HB1750- 91 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 2        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 3        Act;4            (D-11) For taxable years ending on or after 5        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 6        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 7        for the taxable year; 8            (D-12) the amount that is claimed as a federal 9        deduction when computing the taxpayer's federal 10        taxable income for the taxable year and that is 11        attributable to an endowment gift for which the 12        taxpayer receives a credit under the Illinois Gives 13        Tax Credit Act; 14    and by deducting from the total so obtained the following 15    amounts:16            (E) The valuation limitation amount;17            (F) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 18        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 19        and included in such total for the taxable year;20            (G) An amount equal to all amounts included in 21        taxable income as modified by subparagraphs (A), (B), 22        (C) and (D) which are exempt from taxation by this 23        State either by reason of its statutes or Constitution 24        or by reason of the Constitution, treaties or statutes 25        of the United States; provided that, in the case of any 26        statute of this State that exempts income derived from   HB1750- 92 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        bonds or other obligations from the tax imposed under 2        this Act, the amount exempted shall be the interest 3        net of bond premium amortization;4            (H) Any income of the partnership which 5        constitutes personal service income as defined in 6        Section 1348(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code (as in 7        effect December 31, 1981) or a reasonable allowance 8        for compensation paid or accrued for services rendered 9        by partners to the partnership, whichever is greater; 10        this subparagraph (H) is exempt from the provisions of 11        Section 250;12            (I) An amount equal to all amounts of income 13        distributable to an entity subject to the Personal 14        Property Tax Replacement Income Tax imposed by 15        subsections (c) and (d) of Section 201 of this Act 16        including amounts distributable to organizations 17        exempt from federal income tax by reason of Section 18        501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code; this subparagraph 19        (I) is exempt from the provisions of Section 250;20            (J) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 21        under subparagraph (G), an amount equal to the sum of 22        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 23        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 24        and all amounts of expenses allocable to interest and 25        disallowed as deductions by Section 265(a)(1) of the 26        Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for taxable years   HB1750- 93 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        ending on or after August 13, 1999, Sections 2        171(a)(2), 265, 280C, and 832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the 3        Internal Revenue Code, plus, (iii) for taxable years 4        ending on or after December 31, 2011, Section 5        45G(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and, for 6        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, 7        any amount included in gross income under Section 87 8        of the Internal Revenue Code; the provisions of this 9        subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of Section 10        250;11            (K) An amount equal to those dividends included in 12        such total which were paid by a corporation which 13        conducts business operations in a River Edge 14        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 15        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act and conducts substantially 16        all of its operations from a River Edge Redevelopment 17        Zone or zones. This subparagraph (K) is exempt from 18        the provisions of Section 250;19            (L) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 20        job training project established pursuant to the Real 21        Property Tax Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;22            (M) An amount equal to those dividends included in 23        such total that were paid by a corporation that 24        conducts business operations in a federally designated 25        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 26        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided   HB1750- 94 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in 2        subparagraph (K) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 3        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 4        this subparagraph (M);5            (N) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 6        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 7        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 8        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 9        the Internal Revenue Code;10            (O) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 11        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 12        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 13        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 14        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 15        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:16                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 17            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 18            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 19            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 20            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 21            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 22            including the bonus depreciation deduction;23                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 24            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 25            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 26            0.429); and  HB1750- 95 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1                (3) for taxable years ending after December 2            31, 2005:3                    (i) for property on which a bonus 4                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 5                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 6                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 7                by 0.429);8                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 9                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 10                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 11                1.0;12                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 13                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 14                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 15                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 16                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 17                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 18                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 19                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 20                depreciation on that property; and21                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 22                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 23                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 24                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 25                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 26                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation   HB1750- 96 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 2                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 3                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 4                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 5            The aggregate amount deducted under this 6        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 7        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 8        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 9        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 10        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 11        subparagraph (O) is exempt from the provisions of 12        Section 250;13            (P) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, or 14        otherwise disposes of property for which the taxpayer 15        was required in any taxable year to make an addition 16        modification under subparagraph (D-5), then an amount 17        equal to that addition modification.18            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 19        the last day of the last tax year for which a 20        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 21        under subparagraph (O) and for which the taxpayer was 22        required in any taxable year to make an addition 23        modification under subparagraph (D-5), then an amount 24        equal to that addition modification. 25            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 26        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any   HB1750- 97 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        one piece of property.2            This subparagraph (P) is exempt from the 3        provisions of Section 250;4            (Q) The amount of (i) any interest income (net of 5        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 6        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 7        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 8        modification with respect to such transaction under 9        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 10        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 11        the amount of such addition modification and (ii) any 12        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 13        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 14        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 15        that is required to make an addition modification with 16        respect to such transaction under Section 17        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 18        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of such 19        addition modification. This subparagraph (Q) is exempt 20        from Section 250; 21            (R) An amount equal to the interest income taken 22        into account for the taxable year (net of the 23        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 24        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 25        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 26        for the fact that the foreign person's business   HB1750- 98 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 2        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 3        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 4        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 5        business group but for the fact that the person is 6        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 7        included in the unitary business group because he or 8        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 9        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 10        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 11        made for the same taxable year under Section 12        203(d)(2)(D-7) for interest paid, accrued, or 13        incurred, directly or indirectly, to the same person. 14        This subparagraph (R) is exempt from Section 250; 15            (S) An amount equal to the income from intangible 16        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 17        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 18        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 19        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 20        for the fact that the foreign person's business 21        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 22        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 23        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 24        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 25        business group but for the fact that the person is 26        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being   HB1750- 99 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        included in the unitary business group because he or 2        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 3        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 4        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 5        made for the same taxable year under Section 6        203(d)(2)(D-8) for intangible expenses and costs paid, 7        accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to the 8        same person. This subparagraph (S) is exempt from 9        Section 250; 10            (T) For taxable years ending on or after December 11        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 12        add back any insurance premiums under Section 13        203(d)(2)(D-9), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 14        that part of a reimbursement received from the 15        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 16        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 17        company) that would have been taken into account as a 18        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 19        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 20        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 21        (T), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 22        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 23        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (T). This 24        subparagraph (T) is exempt from the provisions of 25        Section 250; and 26            (U) For taxable years beginning on or after   HB1750- 100 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 2        operating in this State and licensed under the 3        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 4        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 5        organization operating in this State and licensed 6        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 7        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 8        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 9        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 10        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 11        this subparagraph (U) are exempt from the provisions 12        of Section 250.  13    (e) Gross income; adjusted gross income; taxable income.14        (1) In general. Subject to the provisions of paragraph 15    (2) and subsection (b)(3), for purposes of this Section 16    and Section 803(e), a taxpayer's gross income, adjusted 17    gross income, or taxable income for the taxable year shall 18    mean the amount of gross income, adjusted gross income or 19    taxable income properly reportable for federal income tax 20    purposes for the taxable year under the provisions of the 21    Internal Revenue Code. Taxable income may be less than 22    zero. However, for taxable years ending on or after 23    December 31, 1986, net operating loss carryforwards from 24    taxable years ending prior to December 31, 1986, may not 25    exceed the sum of federal taxable income for the taxable   HB1750- 101 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1    year before net operating loss deduction, plus the excess 2    of addition modifications over subtraction modifications 3    for the taxable year. For taxable years ending prior to 4    December 31, 1986, taxable income may never be an amount 5    in excess of the net operating loss for the taxable year as 6    defined in subsections (c) and (d) of Section 172 of the 7    Internal Revenue Code, provided that when taxable income 8    of a corporation (other than a Subchapter S corporation), 9    trust, or estate is less than zero and addition 10    modifications, other than those provided by subparagraph 11    (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection (b) for corporations or 12    subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection (c) for 13    trusts and estates, exceed subtraction modifications, an 14    addition modification must be made under those 15    subparagraphs for any other taxable year to which the 16    taxable income less than zero (net operating loss) is 17    applied under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code or 18    under subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 19    (e) applied in conjunction with Section 172 of the 20    Internal Revenue Code.21        (2) Special rule. For purposes of paragraph (1) of 22    this subsection, the taxable income properly reportable 23    for federal income tax purposes shall mean:24            (A) Certain life insurance companies. In the case 25        of a life insurance company subject to the tax imposed 26        by Section 801 of the Internal Revenue Code, life   HB1750- 102 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        insurance company taxable income, plus the amount of 2        distribution from pre-1984 policyholder surplus 3        accounts as calculated under Section 815a of the 4        Internal Revenue Code;5            (B) Certain other insurance companies. In the case 6        of mutual insurance companies subject to the tax 7        imposed by Section 831 of the Internal Revenue Code, 8        insurance company taxable income;9            (C) Regulated investment companies. In the case of 10        a regulated investment company subject to the tax 11        imposed by Section 852 of the Internal Revenue Code, 12        investment company taxable income;13            (D) Real estate investment trusts. In the case of 14        a real estate investment trust subject to the tax 15        imposed by Section 857 of the Internal Revenue Code, 16        real estate investment trust taxable income;17            (E) Consolidated corporations. In the case of a 18        corporation which is a member of an affiliated group 19        of corporations filing a consolidated income tax 20        return for the taxable year for federal income tax 21        purposes, taxable income determined as if such 22        corporation had filed a separate return for federal 23        income tax purposes for the taxable year and each 24        preceding taxable year for which it was a member of an 25        affiliated group. For purposes of this subparagraph, 26        the taxpayer's separate taxable income shall be   HB1750- 103 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        determined as if the election provided by Section 2        243(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code had been in 3        effect for all such years;4            (F) Cooperatives. In the case of a cooperative 5        corporation or association, the taxable income of such 6        organization determined in accordance with the 7        provisions of Section 1381 through 1388 of the 8        Internal Revenue Code, but without regard to the 9        prohibition against offsetting losses from patronage 10        activities against income from nonpatronage 11        activities; except that a cooperative corporation or 12        association may make an election to follow its federal 13        income tax treatment of patronage losses and 14        nonpatronage losses. In the event such election is 15        made, such losses shall be computed and carried over 16        in a manner consistent with subsection (a) of Section 17        207 of this Act and apportioned by the apportionment 18        factor reported by the cooperative on its Illinois 19        income tax return filed for the taxable year in which 20        the losses are incurred. The election shall be 21        effective for all taxable years with original returns 22        due on or after the date of the election. In addition, 23        the cooperative may file an amended return or returns, 24        as allowed under this Act, to provide that the 25        election shall be effective for losses incurred or 26        carried forward for taxable years occurring prior to   HB1750- 104 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        the date of the election. Once made, the election may 2        only be revoked upon approval of the Director. The 3        Department shall adopt rules setting forth 4        requirements for documenting the elections and any 5        resulting Illinois net loss and the standards to be 6        used by the Director in evaluating requests to revoke 7        elections. Public Act 96-932 is declaratory of 8        existing law; 9            (G) Subchapter S corporations. In the case of: (i) 10        a Subchapter S corporation for which there is in 11        effect an election for the taxable year under Section 12        1362 of the Internal Revenue Code, the taxable income 13        of such corporation determined in accordance with 14        Section 1363(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, except 15        that taxable income shall take into account those 16        items which are required by Section 1363(b)(1) of the 17        Internal Revenue Code to be separately stated; and 18        (ii) a Subchapter S corporation for which there is in 19        effect a federal election to opt out of the provisions 20        of the Subchapter S Revision Act of 1982 and have 21        applied instead the prior federal Subchapter S rules 22        as in effect on July 1, 1982, the taxable income of 23        such corporation determined in accordance with the 24        federal Subchapter S rules as in effect on July 1, 25        1982; and26            (H) Partnerships. In the case of a partnership,   HB1750- 105 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        taxable income determined in accordance with Section 2        703 of the Internal Revenue Code, except that taxable 3        income shall take into account those items which are 4        required by Section 703(a)(1) to be separately stated 5        but which would be taken into account by an individual 6        in calculating his taxable income.7        (3) Recapture of business expenses on disposition of 8    asset or business. Notwithstanding any other law to the 9    contrary, if in prior years income from an asset or 10    business has been classified as business income and in a 11    later year is demonstrated to be non-business income, then 12    all expenses, without limitation, deducted in such later 13    year and in the 2 immediately preceding taxable years 14    related to that asset or business that generated the 15    non-business income shall be added back and recaptured as 16    business income in the year of the disposition of the 17    asset or business. Such amount shall be apportioned to 18    Illinois using the greater of the apportionment fraction 19    computed for the business under Section 304 of this Act 20    for the taxable year or the average of the apportionment 21    fractions computed for the business under Section 304 of 22    this Act for the taxable year and for the 2 immediately 23    preceding taxable years.  24    (f) Valuation limitation amount.25        (1) In general. The valuation limitation amount   HB1750- 106 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1    referred to in subsections (a)(2)(G), (c)(2)(I) and 2    (d)(2)(E) is an amount equal to:3            (A) The sum of the pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation 4        amounts (to the extent consisting of gain reportable 5        under the provisions of Section 1245 or 1250 of the 6        Internal Revenue Code) for all property in respect of 7        which such gain was reported for the taxable year; 8        plus9            (B) The lesser of (i) the sum of the pre-August 1, 10        1969 appreciation amounts (to the extent consisting of 11        capital gain) for all property in respect of which 12        such gain was reported for federal income tax purposes 13        for the taxable year, or (ii) the net capital gain for 14        the taxable year, reduced in either case by any amount 15        of such gain included in the amount determined under 16        subsection (a)(2)(F) or (c)(2)(H).17        (2) Pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation amount.18            (A) If the fair market value of property referred 19        to in paragraph (1) was readily ascertainable on 20        August 1, 1969, the pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation 21        amount for such property is the lesser of (i) the 22        excess of such fair market value over the taxpayer's 23        basis (for determining gain) for such property on that 24        date (determined under the Internal Revenue Code as in 25        effect on that date), or (ii) the total gain realized 26        and reportable for federal income tax purposes in   HB1750- 107 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1        respect of the sale, exchange or other disposition of 2        such property.3            (B) If the fair market value of property referred 4        to in paragraph (1) was not readily ascertainable on 5        August 1, 1969, the pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation 6        amount for such property is that amount which bears 7        the same ratio to the total gain reported in respect of 8        the property for federal income tax purposes for the 9        taxable year, as the number of full calendar months in 10        that part of the taxpayer's holding period for the 11        property ending July 31, 1969 bears to the number of 12        full calendar months in the taxpayer's entire holding 13        period for the property.14            (C) The Department shall prescribe such 15        regulations as may be necessary to carry out the 16        purposes of this paragraph. 17    (g) Double deductions. Unless specifically provided 18otherwise, nothing in this Section shall permit the same item 19to be deducted more than once. 20    (h) Legislative intention. Except as expressly provided by 21this Section there shall be no modifications or limitations on 22the amounts of income, gain, loss or deduction taken into 23account in determining gross income, adjusted gross income or 24taxable income for federal income tax purposes for the taxable   HB1750- 108 -LRB104 06073 HLH 16106 b1year, or in the amount of such items entering into the 2computation of base income and net income under this Act for 3such taxable year, whether in respect of property values as of 4August 1, 1969 or otherwise.5(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 6102-658, eff. 8-27-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1112, eff. 712-21-22; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-478, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, 8Article 10, Section 10-900, eff. 6-7-24; 103-592, Article 170, 9Section 170-90, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-647, 10eff. 7-1-24; revised 8-20-24.) 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 12becoming law.